src/fst/test/gt-desc-yamls/Num-Jun_2017_gt-desc.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
      ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfstol: Gen
      ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfstol: Morph
  xerox:
      ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst: Gen
      ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst: Morph
      lookup: App

Tests:

# generated in Oct 2016 while converting Filosoft lexicon to 2-level formalism
# these words were part of the test cases, checked manually

  Numerals:
    viissada+Num+Card+Sg+Nom: viissada
    viissada+Num+Card+Sg+Nom+Foc/gi: viissadagi
    viissada+Num+Card+Pl+Par+Foc/gi+Usage/Rare: viiesadasidki
    viissada+Num+Card+Pl+Par+Usage/Rare: viiesadasid
    viissada+Num+Card+Pl+Tra: viiesadadeks
    viissada+Num+Card+Pl+Tra+Foc/gi: viiesadadekski
    viissada+Num+Card+Pl+Ill: viiesadadesse
    viissada+Num+Card+Pl+Ill+Foc/gi: viiesadadessegi
    viissada+Num+Card+Pl+Ela: viiesadadest
    viissada+Num+Card+Pl+Ela+Foc/gi: viiesadadestki
    viissada+Num+Card+Pl+Ine: viiesadades
    viissada+Num+Card+Pl+Ine+Foc/gi: viiesadadeski
    viissada+Num+Card+Pl+Abe: viiesadadeta
    viissada+Num+Card+Pl+Abe+Foc/gi: viiesadadetagi
    viissada+Num+Card+Pl+All: viiesadadele
    viissada+Num+Card+Pl+All+Foc/gi: viiesadadelegi
    viissada+Num+Card+Pl+Abl: viiesadadelt
    viissada+Num+Card+Pl+Abl+Foc/gi: viiesadadeltki
    viissada+Num+Card+Pl+Ade: viiesadadel
    viissada+Num+Card+Pl+Ade+Foc/gi: viiesadadelgi
    viissada+Num+Card+Pl+Trm: viiesadadeni
    viissada+Num+Card+Pl+Trm+Foc/gi: viiesadadenigi
    viissada+Num+Card+Pl+Ess: viiesadadena
    viissada+Num+Card+Pl+Ess+Foc/gi: viiesadadenagi
    viissada+Num+Card+Pl+Com: viiesadadega
    viissada+Num+Card+Pl+Com+Foc/gi: viiesadadegagi
    viissada+Num+Card+Pl+Gen: viiesadade
    viissada+Num+Card+Pl+Gen+Foc/gi: viiesadadegi
    viissada+Num+Card+Pl+Par: viiesadu
    viissada+Num+Card+Pl+Par+Foc/gi: viiesadugi
    viissada+Num+Card+Sg+Ill: viiesajasse
    viissada+Num+Card+Sg+Ill+Foc/gi: viiesajassegi
    viissada+Num+Card+Pl+Nom: viiesajad
    viissada+Num+Card+Pl+Nom+Foc/gi: viiesajadki
    viissada+Num+Card+Sg+Tra: viiesajaks
    viissada+Num+Card+Sg+Tra+Foc/gi: viiesajakski
    viissada+Num+Card+Sg+Ela: viiesajast
    viissada+Num+Card+Sg+Ela+Foc/gi: viiesajastki
    viissada+Num+Card+Sg+Ine: viiesajas
    viissada+Num+Card+Sg+Ine+Foc/gi: viiesajaski
    viissada+Num+Card+Sg+Abe: viiesajata
    viissada+Num+Card+Sg+Abe+Foc/gi: viiesajatagi
    viissada+Num+Card+Sg+All: viiesajale
    viissada+Num+Card+Sg+All+Foc/gi: viiesajalegi
    viissada+Num+Card+Sg+Abl: viiesajalt
    viissada+Num+Card+Sg+Abl+Foc/gi: viiesajaltki
    viissada+Num+Card+Sg+Ade: viiesajal
    viissada+Num+Card+Sg+Ade+Foc/gi: viiesajalgi
    viissada+Num+Card+Sg+Trm: viiesajani
    viissada+Num+Card+Sg+Trm+Foc/gi: viiesajanigi
    viissada+Num+Card+Sg+Ess: viiesajana
    viissada+Num+Card+Sg+Ess+Foc/gi: viiesajanagi
    viissada+Num+Card+Sg+Com: viiesajaga
    viissada+Num+Card+Sg+Com+Foc/gi: viiesajagagi
    viissada+Num+Card+Sg+Gen: viiesaja
    viissada+Num+Card+Sg+Gen+Foc/gi: viiesajagi
    viissada+Num+Card+Sg+Par+Foc/gi+Usage/Rare: viitsadatki
    viissada+Num+Card+Sg+Par+Usage/Rare: viitsadat
    viissada+Num+Card+Sg+Par: viitsada
    viissada+Num+Card+Sg+Par+Foc/gi: viitsadagi
    kaksteist+Num+Card+Sg+Ill: kaheteistkümnesse
    kaksteist+Num+Card+Sg+Ill+Foc/gi: kaheteistkümnessegi
    kaksteist+Num+Card+Pl+Par: kaheteistkümneid
    kaksteist+Num+Card+Pl+Par+Foc/gi: kaheteistkümneidki
    kaksteist+Num+Card+Pl+Tra+Foc/gi+Usage/Rare: kaheteistkümneikski
    kaksteist+Num+Card+Pl+Tra+Usage/Rare: kaheteistkümneiks
    kaksteist+Num+Card+Pl+Ill+Foc/gi+Usage/Rare: kaheteistkümneissegi
    kaksteist+Num+Card+Pl+Ill+Usage/Rare: kaheteistkümneisse
    kaksteist+Num+Card+Pl+Ela+Foc/gi+Usage/Rare: kaheteistkümneistki
    kaksteist+Num+Card+Pl+Ela+Usage/Rare: kaheteistkümneist
    kaksteist+Num+Card+Pl+Ine+Foc/gi+Usage/Rare: kaheteistkümneiski
    kaksteist+Num+Card+Pl+Ine+Usage/Rare: kaheteistkümneis
    kaksteist+Num+Card+Pl+All+Foc/gi+Usage/Rare: kaheteistkümneilegi
    kaksteist+Num+Card+Pl+All+Usage/Rare: kaheteistkümneile
    kaksteist+Num+Card+Pl+Abl+Foc/gi+Usage/Rare: kaheteistkümneiltki
    kaksteist+Num+Card+Pl+Abl+Usage/Rare: kaheteistkümneilt
    kaksteist+Num+Card+Pl+Ade+Foc/gi+Usage/Rare: kaheteistkümneilgi
    kaksteist+Num+Card+Pl+Ade+Usage/Rare: kaheteistkümneil
    kaksteist+Num+Card+Pl+Tra: kaheteistkümneteks
    kaksteist+Num+Card+Pl+Tra+Foc/gi: kaheteistkümnetekski
    kaksteist+Num+Card+Pl+Ill: kaheteistkümnetesse
    kaksteist+Num+Card+Pl+Ill+Foc/gi: kaheteistkümnetessegi
    kaksteist+Num+Card+Pl+Ela: kaheteistkümnetest
    kaksteist+Num+Card+Pl+Ela+Foc/gi: kaheteistkümnetestki
    kaksteist+Num+Card+Pl+Ine: kaheteistkümnetes
    kaksteist+Num+Card+Pl+Ine+Foc/gi: kaheteistkümneteski
    kaksteist+Num+Card+Pl+Abe: kaheteistkümneteta
    kaksteist+Num+Card+Pl+Abe+Foc/gi: kaheteistkümnetetagi
    kaksteist+Num+Card+Pl+All: kaheteistkümnetele
    kaksteist+Num+Card+Pl+All+Foc/gi: kaheteistkümnetelegi
    kaksteist+Num+Card+Pl+Abl: kaheteistkümnetelt
    kaksteist+Num+Card+Pl+Abl+Foc/gi: kaheteistkümneteltki
    kaksteist+Num+Card+Pl+Ade: kaheteistkümnetel
    kaksteist+Num+Card+Pl+Ade+Foc/gi: kaheteistkümnetelgi
    kaksteist+Num+Card+Pl+Trm: kaheteistkümneteni
    kaksteist+Num+Card+Pl+Trm+Foc/gi: kaheteistkümnetenigi
    kaksteist+Num+Card+Pl+Ess: kaheteistkümnetena
    kaksteist+Num+Card+Pl+Ess+Foc/gi: kaheteistkümnetenagi
    kaksteist+Num+Card+Pl+Com: kaheteistkümnetega
    kaksteist+Num+Card+Pl+Com+Foc/gi: kaheteistkümnetegagi
    kaksteist+Num+Card+Pl+Gen: kaheteistkümnete
    kaksteist+Num+Card+Pl+Gen+Foc/gi: kaheteistkümnetegi
    kaksteist+Num+Card+Pl+Nom: kaheteistkümned
    kaksteist+Num+Card+Pl+Nom+Foc/gi: kaheteistkümnedki
    kaksteist+Num+Card+Sg+Tra: kaheteistkümneks
    kaksteist+Num+Card+Sg+Tra+Foc/gi: kaheteistkümnekski
    kaksteist+Num+Card+Sg+Ela: kaheteistkümnest
    kaksteist+Num+Card+Sg+Ela+Foc/gi: kaheteistkümnestki
    kaksteist+Num+Card+Sg+Ine: kaheteistkümnes
    kaksteist+Num+Card+Sg+Ine+Foc/gi: kaheteistkümneski
    kaksteist+Num+Card+Sg+Abe: kaheteistkümneta
    kaksteist+Num+Card+Sg+Abe+Foc/gi: kaheteistkümnetagi
    kaksteist+Num+Card+Sg+All: kaheteistkümnele
    kaksteist+Num+Card+Sg+All+Foc/gi: kaheteistkümnelegi
    kaksteist+Num+Card+Sg+Abl: kaheteistkümnelt
    kaksteist+Num+Card+Sg+Abl+Foc/gi: kaheteistkümneltki
    kaksteist+Num+Card+Sg+Ade: kaheteistkümnel
    kaksteist+Num+Card+Sg+Ade+Foc/gi: kaheteistkümnelgi
    kaksteist+Num+Card+Sg+Trm: kaheteistkümneni
    kaksteist+Num+Card+Sg+Trm+Foc/gi: kaheteistkümnenigi
    kaksteist+Num+Card+Sg+Ess: kaheteistkümnena
    kaksteist+Num+Card+Sg+Ess+Foc/gi: kaheteistkümnenagi
    kaksteist+Num+Card+Sg+Com: kaheteistkümnega
    kaksteist+Num+Card+Sg+Com+Foc/gi: kaheteistkümnegagi
    kaksteist+Num+Card+Sg+Gen: kaheteistkümne
    kaksteist+Num+Card+Sg+Gen+Foc/gi: kaheteistkümnegi
    kaksteist+Num+Card+Sg+Gen+Foc/gi+Usage/Rare: kaheteistki
    kaksteist+Num+Card+Sg+Gen+Usage/Rare: kaheteist
    kaksteist+Num+Card+Sg+Par+Foc/gi+Usage/Rare: [kahtteistkümmendki, kahtteistki, kahteteistkümmetki, kahteteistkümmendki, kahtteistkümmetki]
    kaksteist+Num+Card+Sg+Par+Usage/Rare: [kahtteistkümmend, kahtteist, kahteteistkümmet, kahteteistkümmend, kahtteistkümmet]
    kaksteist+Num+Card+Sg+Par: kahteteist
    kaksteist+Num+Card+Sg+Par+Foc/gi: kahteteistki
    kaksteist+Num+Card+Sg+Nom+Foc/gi+Usage/Rare: kaksteistkümmendki
    kaksteist+Num+Card+Sg+Nom+Usage/Rare: kaksteistkümmend
    kaksteist+Num+Card+Sg+Nom: kaksteist
    kaksteist+Num+Card+Sg+Nom+Foc/gi: kaksteistki
